Washington statutes.
RCW 18.321.050

Authority of commission and member state.

(1) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to the practice of social work in that state, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.

(2) Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a single state license.

(3) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse action against a licensee's single state license to practice social work in that state.

(4) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse action against a licensee's multistate authorization to practice in that state.

(5) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee's home state to take adverse action against a licensee's multistate license based upon information provided by a remote state.

[ 2024 c 176 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 176: See note following RCW 18.321.005.